New York, session 2025-2026, S717.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contra- 2 ry the Wantagh union free school district shall be exempt from any law, 3 rule, or regulation relating to the use of indigenous names, mascots, 4 and logos, including but not limited to part 123 of title 8 of the New 5 York codes, rules and regulations. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02634-01-5